District of Columbia statutes.
32-1231.15

Applicability.

This chapter shall apply as of October 1, 2015.

Mar. 3, 2015, D.C. Law 20-168, § 16, 61 DCR 11368
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 7009, 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-168, § 16, see § 7009 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “as of October 1, 2015” for “upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.”